Utah statutes.
51-5-5.   Authority to establish funds or subfunds.



The Division of Finance shall, when necessary, establish funds or subfunds, including budgetary and proprietary accounting funds or subfunds within the framework of the major fund types established by this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 154, 1986 General Session

